Louisiana, session 2026, SB449.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2212.1(O) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2212.1. Advertisement and letting to lowest responsible bidder; materials and
supplies; exemptions
* * *
O. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) The purchase of animals trained to perform special tasks, including but
not limited to narcotics detection, bomb detection, arson investigation, and rescue
techniques by the following public entities:
(1)(a) Any local law enforcement agency for the principal purpose of aiding
in the detection of criminal activity, enforcement of laws, or apprehension of
offenders.
(2)(b) Any local public safety agency for the purpose of search and rescue
services.
(2)(a) Any political subdivision that owns or operates a railroad or
railway and makes any of the following used or non-new purchases:
(i) Locomotives and its component parts.
(ii) On-track equipment and its component parts.
(iii) Other rolling stock and its component parts.
(iv) Track maintenance equipment and its attachments.
(b) For purposes of this Paragraph, the meaning of non-new shall be
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 449 ENROLLED
consistent with the disclosures and prohibitions relative to products that are not
new pursuant to 16 CFR 20.1, including products that are used, rebuilt,
reconditioned, reclaimed, or otherwise not in new condition.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.